Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0138.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 227. (1) Application for renewal of a vehicle registration shall must be made by the owner upon on proper application and by payment of the registration fee for the vehicle, as provided by law. (2) Every application shall must be accompanied by the certificate of title pertaining to the vehicle, showing ownership in the person applying for registration at the time of the application. The secretary of state may waive the presentation of the certificate of title. (3) Every application for renewal of a motor vehicle registration shall must be accompanied by proof of vehicle insurance in a form determined by the secretary of state. (4) Notwithstanding subsection (3), the secretary of state shall accept as proof of vehicle insurance a transmission of the applicant's vehicle policy information for an insured vehicle for which vehicle registration is sought. The secretary of state may determine in what format and on what timeline the secretary of state will receive vehicle policy information, which shall must not be required more frequently than every 14 days. In determining the format under this subsection, the secretary of state shall consult with insurers. The transmission to the secretary of state of the vehicle policy information is proof of insurance to the secretary of state for motor vehicle registration purposes only and is not evidence that a policy of insurance actually exists between an insurer and an individual. Vehicle policy information submitted by an insurer and received by the secretary of state under this subsection is confidential, is not subject to the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246, and shall must not be disclosed to any person except the department of community health and human services for purposes of 2006 PA 593, MCL 550.281 to 550.289, or under an order by a court of competent jurisdiction in connection with a claim or fraud investigation or prosecution. (5) If the applicant's current vehicle registration will expire before the applicant's receipt of a registration plate, the secretary of state may issue a temporary registration permit to a person that submits an application and the proper fees and any required donation for a registration plate under this act. The temporary registration permit expires on the date the applicant receives the registration plate or 60 days after the date of issuance of the temporary registration permit, whichever occurs first. A temporary registration permit issued under this section must be issued without charge. (6) As used in this section, "policy information" means the information an automobile insurer is required to supply to the secretary of state under section 3101a of the insurance code of 1956, 1956 PA 218, MCL 500.3101a.